District of Columbia statutes.
47-825.02

Repealed

Public Advocate for Assessments and Taxation.

[Repealed].

May 22, 1997, D.C. Law 11-269, § 2(c), 43 DCR 6868
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-363, § 3(g)(5), 58 DCR 963
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 7142, 62 DCR 10905
Severability of D.C. Law 11-269: Section 3 of D.C. Law 11-269 provided: “If any provision of this act or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are severable.”
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 7112 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).
Temporary addition of § 3a to D.C. Law 11-269: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-825.01.
D.C. Law 18-363, in subsec. (b)(1), substituted “Real Property Tax Appeals Commission for the District of Columbia” for “Board of Real Property Assessments and Appeals”.
1981 Ed., § 47-825.2.
This section is referenced in § 47-825.03.

“(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the Mayor shall appoint the members of the Real Property Tax Appeals Commission for the District of Columbia with the advice and consent of the Council in accordance with the provisions of section 2(b)(3).”

“(a) Sections 2 and 3 shall apply upon Council approval and appointment by the Mayor of a full-time Chairperson and a full-time Vice Chairperson to the Real Property Tax Appeals Commission for the District of Columbia.

Applicability of D.C. Law 18-363: Section 3a of D.C. Law 18-363, as added by D.C. Law 19-155, § 4, provided: “Sec. 3a. Applicability; transition.

Application of Law 11-269: Section 3a of D.C. Law 11-269, as added by § 3 of D.C. Law 12-122, provided that the provisions of the act shall apply to appeals from real property assessments for real property tax year 2000 and for each real property tax year thereafter.